Utah statutes.
9-12-105.   Payment method.

Direct payments for home energy costs shall be made jointly to the responsible householder and to the vendor of energy services to whom the family or individual served owes a payment except in certain cases, as established by rule by the department in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, where payments may be made directly to the responsible householder.

